District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.11

Liability.

The District, a school, or an employee or agent of a school shall be immune from civil liability for the good-faith performance of responsibilities under this subchapter; except, that no immunity shall extend to criminal acts, intentional wrongdoing, gross negligence, or wanton or willful misconduct.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 12, 54 DCR 12230

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 8 of Law 17-52 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 8. Liability waiver.
“(a) No school nor any employee or agent of a school shall be held liable for the good-faith performance of responsibilities under this act.
“(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, nothing in this act shall be interpreted to create a cause of action or to increase or diminish the liability of any person.”
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 17-52 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 8 of Student Access to Treatment Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-82, July 26, 2007, 54 DCR 7999).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 8 of Student Access to Treatment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-140, October 17, 2007, 54 DCR 10736).